lexc/verb/enhuigeh.lexc
LEXICON Case3mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igeamely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igeamely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igeamely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igeamely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igeamely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igeamely§ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeameéy§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeomely§tt      #;    ! t

!bitorol:bitorl
LEXICON AddVerb13mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case13mely;


LEXICON Case13mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igeamely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igeamely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igeamely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igeamely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igeamely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igeamely§ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
!+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
!+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
!+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
!+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeameéy§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeomely§tt      #;    ! t

!bitorol
LEXICON AddVerb5
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep5;

LEXICON Rep5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper5;
                    Imper6;

LEXICON Imper5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep5;
                      Nrep71;
LEXICON Imper6
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep5;
                      Nrep6;

LEXICON Nrep5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper5;
                      NImper71;
LEXICON Nrep71
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper5;
                      NImper71;

LEXICON Nrep6
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper5;
                      NImper6;

LEXICON NImper5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot5;
                      Pot71;
LEXICON NImper71
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot5;
                      Pot71;

LEXICON NImper6
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot5;
                      Pot6;

LEXICON Pot5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf5;
             Case5;
LEXICON Pot71
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf5;
             Case5;

LEXICON Pot6
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf5;
             Case6; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInf5
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
           Case5;

LEXICON Case5
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Verb
bicsakol AddVerb5;
birtokol AddVerb5;
bitorol AddVerb5;
bomol AddVerb5;
bujdokol AddVerb5;
foszol AddVerb5;
fuldokol AddVerb5;
gondnokol AddVerb5;
gyakorol AddVerb5;
haldokol AddVerb5;
háramol AddVerb5;
kotor AddVerb5;
lápiszol AddVerb5;
omol AddVerb5;
oszol AddVerb5;
parancsnokol AddVerb5;
rabol AddVerb5;
romol AddVerb5;
rostokol AddVerb5;
szónokol AddVerb5;
tipor AddVerb5;
tipor:tipr AddVerb13mely;
torol AddVerb5;
tulajdonol AddVerb5;
távvezérel AddVerb5;
tékozol AddVerb5;
varázsol AddVerb5;
vádol AddVerb5;
vándorol AddVerb5;
áramol AddVerb5;
